Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1164.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The sum of $7,805,000 is hereby appropriated from the restricted revenue account within the General Fund to the Office of Consumer Advocate in the Office of Attorney General to provide for the operation of the office for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.123456789101112